Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-107
License; issuance prohibited, when.

If the required proof is not given, if it shall appear that either of the parties is legally incompetent to enter into such contract or that there is any impediment in the way, or if either party is a minor and the consent mentioned in section 42-105 shall not be given, the county clerk shall refuse to grant a license.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 7, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 1546;

C.S.1922, § 1495;

C.S.1929, § 42-107;

R.S.1943, § 42-107;

Laws 1971, LB 728, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 7.